Utah statutes.
61-2d-104.   Negative amortization prohibited.
A high cost mortgage shall provide for regular, periodic payments sufficient
to pay:
(1)  all accrued interest and a portion of principal on the scheduled due date
for each payment; and
(2)  the full amount owed during the term of the loan, if no late fees or
other contingent charges are incurred.
